Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.120

Transfer of license.

No license granted pursuant to this chapter shall be transferable without the consent of the director. No employment agency shall permit any person not mentioned in the license application to become connected with the business as an owner, member, officer, or director without the consent of the director. Consent may be withheld for any reason for which an original application for a license might have been rejected, if the person in question had been mentioned therein.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 12.]